liblouis-back-translation-tables/ar-ar-g1.utb
# liblouis: Generic Arabic Grade 1 table
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. 
# Copyright (C) 2004 by ViewPlus Technologies, Inc.,  www.viewplustech.com
# Copyright (C) 2004 by Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org  
# Copyright (C) 2011-2012 by Mesar Hameed <mesar.hameed@gmail.com>
# Copyright (C) 2018 by Ikrami Ahmad <ikrami.ahmad@gmail.com>

# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.

# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301  USA

# This table was originally built by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
# with help and guidance from Mohammed R. Ramadan <mramadan@nattiq.com>

include text_nabcc.dis All display opcodes
include spaces.uti
include braille-patterns.cti # unicode braille.

# Arabic characters
letter ء 3 # arabic individual hamza (\x0621)
letter آ 345 # arabic alef madd (\x0622)
letter أ 34 # arabic hamza above alef (\x0623)
letter ؤ 1256 # arabic hamza on waw (\x0624)
letter إ 46 # arabic hamza below alef (\x0625)
letter ئ 13456 # arabic hamza on iaa (\x0626)
letter ا 1 # arabic Alef (\x0626)
letter ب 12 # arabic baa (\x0628)
letter ة 16 # arabic taa marbuta (\x0629)
letter ث 1456 # arabic thaa (\x062B)
letter ت 2345 # arabic Taa (\x062A)
letter ج 245 # arabic jeem (\x062C)
letter ح 156 # arabic strong haa (\x062D)
letter خ 1346 # arabic Khaa (\x062E)
letter د 145 # arabic dal (\x062F)
letter ذ 2346 # arabic thal (\x0630)
letter ر 1235 # arabic raa (\x0631)
letter ز 1356 # arabic zaai (\x0632)
letter س 234 # arabic seen (\x0633)
letter ش 146 # arabic sheen (\x0634)
letter ص 12346 # arabic saad (\x0635)
letter ض 1246 # arabic dhaad (\x0636)
letter ط 23456 # arabic strong taa (\x0637)
letter ظ 123456 # arabic strong thaa (\x0638)
letter ع 12356 # arabic ayn (\x0639)
letter غ 126 # arabic ghayn (\x063A)
letter ف 124 # arabic faa (\x0641)
letter ق 12345 # arabic strong qaaf (\x0642)
letter ك 13 # arabic kaaf (\x0643)
letter ل 123 # arabic laam (\x0644)
letter م 134 # arabic meem (\x0645)
letter ن 1345 # arabic noon (\x0646)
letter ه 125 # arabic soft haa (\x0647)
letter و 2456 # arabic waaw (\x0648)
letter ى 135 # arabic alef maqsoora (\x0649)
letter ي 24 # arabic iaa (\x064A)
letter َ 2 # arabic diacritic symbol fathah (\x064E)
letter ِ 15 # arabic diacritic symbol kasrah (\x0650)
letter ً 23 # arabic diacritic symbol tanween fath (\x064B)
letter ٌ 26 # arabic diacritic symbol tanween dham (\x064C)
letter ٍ 35 # arabic diacritic symbol tanween kasr (\x064D)
letter ُ 136 # arabic diacritic symbol dhamma (\x064F)
letter ّ 6 # arabic diacritic symbol shadda (\x0651)
letter ْ 25 # arabic diacritic symbol sukoon (\x0652)
noback sign ـ 2 # arabic tatweel (\x0640)

always \x0644\x0627 1236 # to join lam and alef together in one cell if they come in one word
midendword \x0651 6 # to indicate that Shadda can never come at the beginning of a word
midendword \x0652 25 # arabic diacritic symbol sukoon (\x0652)
midendword َ 2

#the following to correct Shadda symbol, which should be written before the character in Arabic braille code. this will consists of every arabic character followed by the Shadda diacritic symbol, and a dot pattern of the braille shadda followed by the character.
noback always ءّ 6-3
noback always آّ 6-345
noback always أّ 6-34
noback always ؤّ 6-1256
noback always إّ 6-46
noback always ئّ 6-13456
noback always اّ 6-1
noback always بّ 6-12
noback always ةّ 6-16
noback always ثّ 6-1456
noback always تّ 6-2345
noback always جّ 6-245
noback always حّ 6-156
noback always خّ 6-1346
noback always دّ 6-145
noback always ذّ 6-2346
noback always رّ 6-1235
noback always زّ 6-1356
noback always سّ 6-234
noback always شّ 6-146
noback always صّ 6-12346
noback always ضّ 6-1246
noback always طّ 6-23456
noback always ظّ 6-123456
noback always عّ 6-12356
noback always غّ 6-126
noback always فّ 6-124
noback always قّ 6-12345
noback always كّ 6-13
noback always لّ 6-123
noback always مّ 6-134
noback always نّ 6-1345
noback always هّ 6-125
noback always وّ 6-2456
noback always يّ 6-24
noback always لاّ 6-1236

punctuation \x2044 456-46

punctuation ، 5 # Arabic comma (\x060C)
punctuation \x061B 56 # Arabic semiColon
punctuation ; 56
punctuation : 5-2
punctuation \x061F 236 # Arabic question mark ؟
punctuation ? 236
punctuation \x06D4 256 # Arabic Full stop
punctuation . 256
punctuation , 2
punctuation ! 235
punctuation " 2356
sign # 3456
sign $ 4-234
punctuation % 25-1234
sign & 4-12346
punctuation ' 3 # apostrophe
punctuation ) 356
punctuation ( 236
sign * 56-35
math + 56-235
punctuation - 36-36
math / 456-36 # changed from the unified braille code, so that it does not conflict with the letter \x0623

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456 number sign, just a dots operand
noback multind 56-6 letsign capsletter
# letsign 56
noback capsletter 6
noback begcapsword 6-6
noback endcapsword 6-3
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
noback begemph italic 46
noback endemph italic 46-46
noback begemph bold 456
noback endemph bold 456-456
noback begcomp 456-346
noback endcomp 456-156

# Arabic numbers
digit \x0660 245 # 0 (٠)
digit \x0661 1 # 1 (١)
digit \x0662 12 # 2 (٢)
digit \x0663 14 # 3 (٣)
digit \x0664 145 # 4 (٤)
digit \x0665 15 # 5 (٥)
digit \x0666 124 # 6 (٦)
digit \x0667 1245 # 7 (٧)
digit \x0668 125 # 8 (٨)
digit \x0669 24 # 9 (٩)
litdigit \x0660 245 # 0 (٠)
litdigit \x0661 1 # 1 (١)
litdigit \x0662 12 # 2 (٢)
litdigit \x0663 14 # 3 (٣)
litdigit \x0664 145 # 4 (٤)
litdigit \x0665 15 # 5 (٥)
litdigit \x0666 124 # 6 (٦)
litdigit \x0667 1245 # 7 (٧)
litdigit \x0668 125 # 8 (٨)
litdigit \x0669 24 # 9 (٩)

# Latin numbers
include loweredDigits6Dots.uti
include litdigits6Dots.uti

math < 0-246-0
math = 56-2356 
math > 0-135-0
sign @ 4-1 # the unified braille code used dot 4 only to represent it. i changed it as it is written in the unified english code, so that it can be read in grade2 as well.

include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
punctuation [ 6-236
sign \\ 45-36 # not mentioned in the Unified arabic braille code.
punctuation ] 356-3 
sign ^ 346 # circumflex accent
sign _ 6-36 # underscore
noback sign ` 4 # grave accent
punctuation { 5-236
sign | 5-25 # changed so that it is not confused with number seven or the latin letter g
punctuation } 356-2
math ~ 45-25 # changed so that it can be read in grade2 context
sign \x00A2 4-14 # ¢ cents sign
sign \x00A3 4-123 # £ pounds sign
noback sign \x00A5 4-13456 # ¥ yen sign
noback sign \x00A7 4-234-3 # section sign §
noback sign \x00A9 2356-6-14-2356 # © copyright sign
noback sign \x00AE 16-256 # ® Registered mark
punctuation \x00Ad 36-36 # soft hyphen
noback sign \x00B0 356 # ° degrees sign
noback sign \x00B5 46-134 # µ micro sign
noback sign \x00B6 4-1234-345 # ¶ pilcrow sign
sign \x00AB 2356 # LEFT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION
sign \x00BB 2356 # RIGHT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION
punctuation \x2018 2356 # smart single left quotation mark
punctuation \x2019 2356 # smart single right quotation mark
punctuation \x201C 2356 # smart opening double quote
punctuation \x201D 2356 # smart closing double quote
punctuation \x201E 2356 # smart double low quotation mark
punctuation \x201F 2356 # smart double high reverse quotation mark

sign \x00BF 236 # inverted question mark
math \x00D7 56-236 # × multiplication sign
math \x00F7 56-256 # ÷ division sign
sign \x200C 9 # ZERO WIDTH NON-JOINER
punctuation \x2010 36-36 # hyphen
punctuation \x2011 36-36 #  non-breaking hyphen
punctuation \x2013 4-36 # en dash
punctuation \x2026 3-3-3 # smart ellipsis
sign \x20AC 4-15 # Euro sign
noback sign \x25CF 35 # BLACK CIRCLE

include countries.cti
###@@@
postpunc ) 2356
prepunc ( 2356
###@@@
prepunc " 456-356
postpunc " 456-236
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
begnum # 3456-4 print number sign before number
midnum . 46
midnum , 2
postpunc , 2
decpoint . 46
midnum - 36-36
hyphen - 36-36
#capsnocont
postpunc ، 5 # Arabic comma (\x060C)
postpunc . 256
postpunc \x06D4 256 # Arabic Full stop
postpunc ; 56
postpunc \x061B 56 # Arabic semiColon
midnum : 5-2
postpunc : 5-2
postpunc ! 235
###@@@
midnum / 456-34
always / 456-34
always < 0-246-0
always > 0-135-0
postpunc \x061F 236 # Arabic question mark ؟
postpunc ? 236
endnum % 25-1234
midnum ^ 346
noback always ^ 346
always ~ 45-25
always & 4-12346
midnum * 56-35
always * 56-35
always [ 6-236
always ] 356-3
always { 5-236
always } 356-2
always @ 4-1
always \\ 45-36
always | 5-25
always ... 3-3-3
always $ 4-234

# special character sequences
compbrl :// URLs
compbrl www.
compbrl .com
compbrl .edu
compbrl .gov
compbrl .mil
compbrl .net
compbrl .org
# include countries.cti
compbrl .doc
compbrl .htm
compbrl .html
compbrl .tex
compbrl .txt
compbrl .gif
compbrl .jpg
compbrl .png
compbrl .wav
compbrl .tar
compbrl .zip


###@@@ Shadda combining 
always \x0621\x0651 6-3 # arabic individual hamza
always \x0622\x0651 6-345 # arabic alef madd
always \x0623\x0651 6-34 # arabic hamza above alef
always \x0624\x0651 6-1256 # arabic hamza on waw
always \x0625\x0651 6-46 # arabic hamza below alef
always \x0626\x0651 6-13456 # arabic hamza on iaa
always \x0626\x0651 6-1 # arabic Alef
always \x0628\x0651 6-12 # arabic baa
always \x0629\x0651 6-16 # arabic taa marbuta
always \x062B\x0651 6-1456 # arabic thaa
always \x062A\x0651 6-2345 # arabic Taa
always \x062C\x0651 6-245 # arabic jeem
always \x062D\x0651 6-156 # arabic strong haa
always \x062E\x0651 6-1346 # arabic Khaa
always \x062F\x0651 6-145 # arabic dal
always \x0630\x0651 6-2346 # arabic thal
always \x0631\x0651 6-1235 # arabic raa
always \x0632\x0651 6-1356 # arabic zaai
always \x0633\x0651 6-234 # arabic seen
always \x0634\x0651 6-146 # arabic sheen
always \x0635\x0651 6-12346 # arabic saad
always \x0636\x0651 6-1246 # arabic dhaad
always \x0637\x0651 6-23456 # arabic strong taa
always \x0638\x0651 6-123456 # arabic strong thaa
always \x0639\x0651 6-12356 # arabic ayn
always \x063A\x0651 6-126 # arabic ghayn
always \x0641\x0651 6-124 # arabic faa
always \x0642\x0651 6-12345 # arabic strong qaaf
always \x0643\x0651 6-13 # arabic kaaf
always \x0644\x0651 6-123 # arabic laam
always \x0645\x0651 6-134 # arabic meem
always \x0646\x0651 6-1345 # arabic noon
always \x0647\x0651 6-125 # arabic soft haa
always \x0648\x0651 6-2456 # arabic waaw
always \x0649\x0651 6-135 # arabic alef maqsoora
always \x064A\x0651 6-24 # arabic iaa
